Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,166
Stopping, standing, or parking prohibited; exceptions.

(1) Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or when in compliance with law or the directions of a peace officer or traffic control device, no person shall:

(a) Stop, stand, or park any vehicle:

(i) On the roadway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street;

(ii) On a sidewalk;

(iii) Within an intersection;

(iv) On a crosswalk;

(v) Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within thirty feet of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone unless the Department of Transportation or the local authority indicates a different length by signs or markings;

(vi) Alongside or opposite any street excavation or obstruction when stopping, standing, or parking would obstruct traffic;

(vii) Upon any bridge or other elevated structure over a highway or within a highway tunnel;

(viii) On any railroad track; or

(ix) At any place where official signs prohibit stopping;

(b) Stand or park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except momentarily to pick up or discharge a passenger or passengers:

(i) In front of a public or private driveway;

(ii) Within fifteen feet of a fire hydrant;

(iii) Within twenty feet of a crosswalk at an intersection;

(iv) Within thirty feet of any flashing signal, stop sign, yield sign, or other traffic control device located at the side of a roadway;

(v) Within twenty feet of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on the side of a street opposite the entrance to any fire station within seventy-five feet of such entrance when properly signposted; or

(vi) At any place where official signs prohibit standing; or

(c) Park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading merchandise or passengers:

(i) Within fifty feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing; or

(ii) At any place where official signs prohibit parking.

(2) No person shall move a vehicle not lawfully under his or her control into any such prohibited area or away from a curb such a distance as shall be unlawful.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 72;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-672;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 262;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 207.